zh-CN: 压印笔笔尖形状: 球形; 凿形; 锥形; 双球形（两种尺寸）; 椭圆形/子弹形; 尖头; 水滴形; 其他
hr-HR: Oblik vrha olovke za utiskivanje: Kuglica; Dlijeto; Stožac; Dvostruka kuglica (dvije veličine); Ovalni / u obliku metka; Šiljasti; U obliku suze; Ostalo
zh-TW: 壓花觸針筆尖形狀: 球形; 鑿形; 錐形; 雙頭圓珠 (兩種尺寸); 橢圓形/子彈形; 尖頭; 水滴形; 其他
bg-BG: Форма на върха на инструмента за релеф: Сферичен; Скосен; Конусовиден; Двоен сферичен (два размера); Овален/тип куршум; Заострен; Тип сълза; Други
fi: Kohokuviointikynän kärjen muoto: Pallo; Taltta; Kartio; Kaksoispallo (kaksi kokoa); Ovaali/luoti; Terävä; Pisara; Muu
tr: Kabartma kalemi uç şekli: Top; Keski; Koni; Çift top (iki boyut); Oval/mermi; Sivri; Gözyaşı; Diğer
sk-SK: Tvar hrotu reliéfneho stylusu: Guľôčka; Skosený hrot; Kužeľ; Dvojitá guľôčka (dve veľkosti); Ovál/náboj; Špicatý; Kvapka; Iné
ko: 엠보싱 스타일러스 팁 형태: 볼; 끌; 콘; 듀얼 볼(두 가지 사이즈); 타원형/총알형; 뾰족한 형태; 물방울 형태; 기타
pt-BR: Forma da ponta do boleador de relevo: Esfera; Chanfrado; Cone; Dupla esfera (dois tamanhos); Oval/Bala; Pontiagudo; Gota; Outro
sv: Spetsform på präglingspenna: Kula; Mejsel; Kon; Dubbelkula (två storlekar); Oval/kula; Spetsig; Droppe; Övrigt
sl-SI: Oblika konice pisala za reliefno odtiskovanje: Kroglica; Dleto; Stožec; Dvojna kroglica (dve velikosti); Ovalna / oblika naboja; Koničasta; Kapljica; Drugo
fr: Forme de la pointe du stylet d’embossage: Bille; Biseau; Cône; Double bille (deux tailles); Ovale/ogive; Pointue; Goutte; Autre
ru: Форма наконечника тиснильного стилуса: Шарик; Долото; Конус; Двойной шарик (два размера); Овал/Пуля; Заостренный; Капля; Другое
hu: Dombornyomó stylus hegy formája: Golyó; Véső; Kúp; Dupla golyó (két méret); Ovális/lövedék; Hegyes; Csepp alakú; Egyéb
ja: エンボス加工用スタイラスチップのShapes: ボール; チゼル; コーン; デュアルボール (2サイズ); 楕円/弾丸; ポイント; ティアドロップ; その他
nb: Former på pregepennspiss: Kule; Meisel; Kjegle; Dobbel kule (to størrelser); Oval/kulespiss; Spiss; Dråpe; Annet
cs: Tvar hrotu stylusu pro embosování: Kulička; Zkosený; Kužel; Dvojitá kulička (dvě velikosti); Oválný / oblý; Špičatý; Slza; Jiné
th: รูปทรงปลายหัวปากกาสไตลัสแบบนูน: หัวกลม; หัวตัด; ทรงกรวย; หัวกลมคู่ (สองขนาด); วงรี/หัวกระสุน; หัวแหลม; ทรงหยดน้ำ; อื่นๆ
vi: Hình dạng đầu bút dập nổi: Đầu bi; Đầu đục; Đầu nón; Bi kép (hai kích cỡ); Đầu bầu dục/viên đạn; Đầu nhọn; Đầu giọt nước; Khác
lt-LT: Reljefinio įrankio antgalio forma: Rutuliukas; Kaltelis; Kūgis; Dvigubas rutuliukas (dviejų dydžių); Ovalas / kulka; Smailus; Lašelis; Kita
it: Forma della punta dello stilo per goffratura: Sfera; Scalpello; Cono; Doppia sfera (due misure); Ovale/a proiettile; A punta; A goccia; Altro
pl: Kształt końcówki dłutka do embossingu: Kulisty; Dłutkowy; Stożkowy; Podwójna kulka (dwa rozmiary); Owalny / Pocisk; Spiczasty; Kropla; Inny
da: Formen på prægningsstiftens spids: Kugle; Mejsel; Kegle; Dobbelt kugle (to størrelser); Oval/kugleformet; Spids; Dråbe; Andet
nl: Reliëfstylus puntvorm: Bal; Beitel; Kegel; Dubbele bal (twee maten); Ovaal/kogel; Spits; Druppel; Overige
el: Σχήμα άκρης γραφίδας με ανάγλυφη γραφή: Μπίλια; Σμίλη; Κώνος; Διπλή μπίλια (δύο μεγέθη); Οβάλ/σφαίρα; Μυτερό; Σταγόνα; Άλλο
pt-PT: Forma da ponta de caneta para relevo: Bola; Cinzel; Cone; Bola dupla (dois tamanhos); Oval/Bala; Pontiagudo; Gota; Outro
ro-RO: Forma vârfului stylusului pentru gofrare: Sferă; Daltă; Con; Sferă dublă (două dimensiuni); Oval/Glonț; Ascuțit; Lacrimă; Altele
es: Forma de la punta del lápiz para gofrado: Bola; Cincel; Cono; Doble bola (dos tamaños); Óvalo/bala; Puntiaguda; Lágrima; Otro
en: Embossing stylus tip shape: Ball; Chisel; Cone; Dual ball (two sizes); Oval/Bullet; Pointed; Teardrop; Other
de: Form der Prägestiftspitze: Kugel; Meißel; Kegel; Doppelkugel (zwei Größen); Oval/Patrone; Spitz; Tropfen; Sonstige